Maryland, session 2025, HB0942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 12–201(e) through (u) of Article – Economic Development of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 12–201(f) through (v), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(E) “BLIGHTED AREA” MEANS AN AREA IN WHICH A MAJORITY OF
BUILDINGS HAVE DECLINED IN PRODUCTIVITY BY REASON OF OBSOLESCENCE,
DEPRECIATION, OR OTHER CAUSES TO AN EXTENT THAT THEY NO LONGER JUSTIFY
FUNDAMENTAL REPAIRS AND ADEQUATE MAINTENANCE.
(i) (1) “Development district” means a contiguous OR NONCONTIGUOUS area
designated by a resolution.
(2) “Development district” includes an extraordinary development district.
12–202.
(a) (1) This subtitle is self–executing.
(2) A political subdivision need not amend its charter to exercise the
powers granted by this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 942 3
(b) (1) [This] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THIS subtitle does not apply in Baltimore City.
(2) THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 12–203(A)(1) AND 12–204(G) OF THIS
SUBTITLE PERTAINING TO NONCONTIGUOUS BLIGHTED AREAS APPLY IN
BALTIMORE CITY.
12–203.
(a) Before issuing bonds, the governing body of the political subdivision shall:
(1) by resolution:
(i) designate a contiguous area within its jurisdiction as a
development district;
(ii) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, DESIGNATE
A NONCONTIGUOUS BLIGHTED AREA WITHIN ITS JURISDICTION AS A DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT;
(III) identify an area that has been designated a sustainable
community; or
[(iii)] (IV) identify an area that has been designated a RISE zone;
(D) IF THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IS A NONCONTIGUOUS BLIGHTED
AREA, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SHALL LIMIT THE
REDEVELOPMENT OF NONCONTIGUOUS PARCELS WITHIN THE DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING THAT IS DEED RESTRICTED TO HOUSEHOLDS
WHOSE HOUSEHOLD INCOME DOES NOT EXCEED 80% OF AREA MEDIAN INCOME.
12–204.
(a) Notwithstanding any limitation of law, an issuer may issue bonds from time
to time to finance the development of an industrial, commercial, or residential area.
(b) To issue bonds under this subtitle, the governing body of a political subdivision
shall adopt an ordinance that:
(1) describes the proposed undertaking; and
(2) states:
(i) that the governing body has complied with §§ 12–203 and
12–208(c) and (d) of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 942
(ii) the maximum principal amount of the bonds; and
(iii) the maximum rate of interest on the bonds.
(c) The ordinance may specify the following for bonds issued to carry out the
financing of the proposed undertaking:
(1) the principal amount;
(2) the rate of interest;
(3) the manner and terms of sale;
(4) the time of execution, issuance, and delivery;
(5) the form and denomination;
(6) the manner in which, and the times and places at which principal and
interest shall be paid;
(7) conditions for redemption before maturity; or
(8) other provisions consistent with this subtitle that the governing body of
the political subdivision determines are necessary or desirable.
(d) The revenue authority of Prince George’s County may issue bonds in
accordance with an ordinance adopted by the governing body of Prince George’s County.
(e) The ordinance may specify the items listed in subsection (c) of this section or
may authorize:
(1) the finance board to specify those items by resolution or ordinance; or
(2) the chief executive to specify those items by executive order.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, neither an
ordinance authorizing the bonds nor an ordinance, resolution, or executive order issued,
passed, or adopted under this section may be subject to referendum because of any other
State or local law.
(2) An ordinance that authorizes the pledge of the full faith and credit of a
political subdivision to the payment of principal and interest on a bond is subject to any
applicable right to referendum.
(G) IF THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT IS A NONCONTIGUOUS BLIGHTED
AREA, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY UTILIZE THE
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATION WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT OF

HOUSE BILL 942 5
HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT TO ISSUE BONDS AUTHORIZED BY AN
ORDINANCE ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.